Rhode Island statutes. Title 34 Property
Chapter 35 Enforcement of Common Law and Contractual Liens

34-35-1.
Complaint for order of sale.

Whoever has a lien for money due him or her on account of work and labor, care and diligence, or money expended on or about personal property or for storage of personal property or has a lien therefor on account by reason of any contract expressed or implied, if the money is not paid within thirty (30) days after a demand in writing delivered to the owner or one of the owners, or left at his or her usual place of abode, if within this state, with some person living there, or made by letter mailed to him or her at his or her usual post office address outside the state, may apply for an order for the sale of the property in satisfaction of the debt by civil action in the superior court for the county where the plaintiff or one of the plaintiffs resides.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 28; C.P.A. 1905, § 1142; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 452, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

34-35-1

; P.L. 1991, ch. 197, § 1.

34-35-2.
Citation to owner.

Upon filing the complaint, the clerk of the court shall issue a citation to the owner of the property to appear before the court at a time and place designated, to show cause why such lien should not be allowed and enforced by the court for the amount claimed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 29; C.P.A. 1905, § 1227; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 452, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

34-35-2

.

34-35-3.
Service of citation.

The citation shall contain the substance of the complaint and shall be served on the owner by a deputy sheriff, at least ten (10) days before the return day of the citation, by leaving an attested copy at the last and usual place of abode of the owner, or by reading the same in his or her presence and hearing, if he or she resides in this state. If the owner resides outside the state, the citation may be served upon him or her in the manner prescribed by law for service of subpoenas on nonresident defendants.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 30; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 452, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

34-35-3

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 69.

34-35-4.
Citation of unknown owner.

If the owner of the property is unknown, the complaint may be filed thirty (30) days after the money becomes due, and a citation may issue “to the unknown owner,” describing the property. In that case, or if the residence of the owner is unknown, the citation may be served by publication in the manner as the court may direct.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 452, § 4; G.L. 1956, §

34-35-4

.

34-35-5.
Order of sale — Distribution of proceeds.

If the owner makes default at the time appointed, or if, upon a hearing of the parties, it appears that a lien exists upon the property, and that the property ought to be sold for the satisfaction of the debt, the court may make an order for that purpose, and the property may be sold in conformity with the order. The court shall ascertain the amount due up to the time of the entering of the order, and any surplus of the proceeds of the sale, after satisfying the debt and all costs and charges, shall be paid into the registry of the court for the benefit of the lawful owner of the property.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 452, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

34-35-5

.

34-35-6.
Alternative remedies unimpaired.

This chapter shall not limit or restrict the right of any party having a lien upon property to hold or dispose of the property in any other manner authorized by law, or by contract of parties.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 206, § 33; G.L. 1909, ch. 257, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 301, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 452, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

34-35-6

.